Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 28
UNIVERSITY OF IDAHO

Section.

33-2801. University established.

There is hereby established in this state, at the town of Moscow, in the county of Latah, an institution of learning, by the name and style of the University of Idaho.

33-2802. Board of regents.

The general supervision, government and control of the University of Idaho is vested in the state board of education which also constitutes the board of regents of the university and is known as the state board of education and board of regents of the University of Idaho.

33-2803. Executive committee of board. [Repealed.]

33-2804. General duties of board.

The members of the state board of education in the performance of their functions as the board of regents of the university and their successors in office, shall constitute a body corporate, by the name of the regents of the University of Idaho, and shall possess all the powers necessary or convenient to accomplish the objects and perform the duties prescribed by law, and shall have the custody of the books, records, buildings and other property of said university. The board shall elect a president, secretary and treasurer, who shall perform such duties as shall be prescribed by the by-laws of the board. The secretary shall keep a faithful record of all the transactions of the board and of the executive committee thereof. The treasurer shall perform all the duties of such office, subject to such regulations as the board may adopt, and shall be bonded to the state of Idaho in the time, form and manner prescribed by chapter 8, title 59, Idaho Code.

33-2805. Meetings of board — Quorum — Adjournment.

The time of the election of the president, secretary and treasurer of said board, and the duration of their respective terms of office and the time for holding such meetings as may be required, and the manner of notifying the same, shall be determined by the by-laws of the board. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but a less number may adjourn from time to time.

33-2806. Powers of board — Sectarian tests prohibited.

The board of regents shall enact laws for the government of the university in all its branches, elect a president and the requisite number of professors, instructors, officers and employees, and fix the salaries and the term of office of each, and determine the moral and educational qualifications of applicants for admission to the various courses of instruction; but no instruction either sectarian in religion or partisan in politics shall ever be allowed in any department of the university, and no sectarian or partisan test shall ever be allowed or exercised in the appointment of regents or in the election of professors, teachers, or other officers of the university, or in the admission of students thereto, or for any purpose whatever. The board of regents shall have power to remove the president or any professor, instructor or officer of the university, when, in their judgment, the interests of the university require it. The board may prescribe rules and regulations for the management of the libraries, cabinets, museum, laboratories and all other property of the university and of its several departments, and for the care and preservation thereof, with penalties and forfeitures, by way of damages for their violation, which may be sued for and collected in the name of the board before any court having jurisdiction of such action.

33-2807. Erection of buildings.

The board of regents are authorized to expend such portion of the income of the university [income] fund as they may deem expedient for the erection of suitable buildings and the purchase of apparatus, a library, cabinets and additions thereto.

33-2808. Duties of treasurer.

The treasurer of said board shall, out of any moneys in his hands belonging to said board, pay all orders drawn upon him by the president and secretary thereof, when accompanied by vouchers fully explaining the character of the expenditure, and the books and accounts of the treasurer shall at all times be opened to the inspection of the board. The treasurer shall make an annual report to the president of the board of all transactions connected with the duties of his office.

33-2809. State treasurer as treasurer of regents of university.

In the event the state board of education, acting as the regents of the University of Idaho, shall elect the state treasurer as the treasurer of the regents of the university, the said state treasurer is hereby empowered and directed to act as the treasurer of the regents of the University of Idaho and as such officer of the regents of the university he shall receive and deposit all funds received by him in such general or special fund that the regents may find necessary and expedient to create for the lawful management of the finances of the University of Idaho and shall disburse all funds deposited with him as provided for in section 33-2808[, Idaho Code].

33-2810. Deposit of moneys of regents of University of Idaho.

The state treasurer shall deposit and at all times keep on deposit, subject to the provisions of chapter 27 of title 67[, Idaho Code], being the State Depository Law, and subsequent amendments thereof, all moneys deposited with him as treasurer of the regents of the University of Idaho in the event he shall be elected as such treasurer by such board: provided, however, that the moneys belonging to regents of the University of Idaho shall be so deposited and accounted for that any and all interest accruing for and on account thereof shall be accredited to any general or special fund of the regents of the University of Idaho.

33-2811. Powers of president and faculty — Courses of study and textbooks — Diplomas — Discipline of students.

The president of the university shall be president of the faculty, or of the several faculties as they may be hereafter established, and the executive head of the instructional force in all its departments. As such, he shall have authority, subject to the board of regents, to give general direction to the instruction and scientific investigation of the university, and so long as the interests of the institution require it, he shall be charged with the duties of one of the professorships. The immediate government of the university shall be intrusted to the faculty, but the regents shall have the power to regulate courses of instruction, and prescribe the books or works to be used in the several courses, and also to confer such degrees and grant such diplomas as are usual in universities, or as they shall deem appropriate, and to confer upon the faculty, by by-laws, the power to suspend or expel students for misconduct or other cause prescribed by such by-laws.

33-2812. Departments of university.

The object of the University of Idaho shall be to provide the means of acquiring a thorough knowledge of the various branches of learning connected with the scientific, industrial and professional pursuits, and to this end it shall consist of the following colleges or departments, to wit:

The college or department of arts.

The college or department of letters.

The professional or other colleges or departments, as may from time to time be added thereto or connected therewith.

33-2813. College of agriculture.

The action of the regents of the University of Idaho, in establishing and maintaining a college of agriculture in connection with the university at Moscow, and in accordance with an act of Congress, approved July 2, 1862, and known as the land grant act, as supplemented by an act of Congress for the more complete endowment and support of colleges of agriculture and mechanic arts, approved August 30, 1890, is a proper exercise of the lawful powers of the regents as set forth in the act creating the university, and the clauses of the state constitution confirming the same. And the said action of the regents in establishing and maintaining the said college of agriculture in accordance with said laws, is hereby expressly approved and confirmed.

33-2814. Courses.

Subject to the authority of the regents to prescribe programs and courses of study, the college or department of arts shall embrace courses of instruction in mathematical, physical and natural sciences, with their application to the industrial arts, such as agriculture, mechanics, engineering, mining and metallurgy, manufactures [manufacturing], architecture and commerce, and such branches included in the college of letters as shall be necessary to a proper fitness of the pupils in the scientific and practical courses for their chosen pursuits; and as soon as the income of the university will allow, in such order as the wants of the public shall seem to require, the said courses in the sciences and their application to the practical arts shall be expanded into distinct colleges of the university, each with its own faculty and appropriate title. The college of letters shall be coexistent with the college of arts and shall embrace a liberal course of instruction in language, literature and philosophy, together with such courses or parts of courses in the college of arts as the regents of the university shall prescribe.

33-2815. Practical prospecting and practical mining — Courses in.

The board of regents of the University of Idaho, and of the Idaho geological survey may prescribe a special course of instructions in practical prospecting, including a short course in practical mining including identification and classification of minerals at the University of Idaho, or in a mobile unit of the school of mines, which shall be open to special students desirous of studying such subjects, but who may be ineligible for admission to enter the University of Idaho on account of having deficient entrance credits.

33-2816. Women students admitted.

The university shall be open to female as well as male students, under such regulations and restrictions as the board of regents may deem proper.

33-2817. Tuition not required

Exceptions. [Repealed.]